California statutes. Education Code
 education program, including whether the annual goals for the pupil are being achieved, the appropriateness of the placement, and to make any necessary revisions, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 56343. The local educational agency shall maintain procedures to ensure that the individualized education program team reviews the pupil’s
 individualized education program periodically, but not less frequently than annually, to determine whether the annual goals for the pupil are being achieved, and revises the individualized education program as appropriate to address, among other matters, the provisions specified in subdivision (d) of Section 56341.1, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 56380.

(k) A reassessment of a pupil shall occur not more frequently than once a year, unless the parent and the local educational agency agree otherwise in writing, and shall occur at least once every three years, unless the parent and the local educational agency agree, in writing, that a reassessment is unnecessary, pursuant to Section 56381, and in accordance with Section 1414(a)(2) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(l) A meeting of an individualized education program team requested by a parent or guardian to review an individualized education program pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56343 shall be held within 30 calendar days, not counting days between the pupil’s regular school sessions, terms, or days of school vacation in excess of five schooldays, from the date of receipt of the parent’s or guardian’s written request, pursuant to Section 56343.5.

(m) If an individual with exceptional needs transfers from district to district within the state, the following apply pursuant to Section 56325:

(1) If the child has an individualized education program and transfers into a district from a district not operating programs under the same special education local plan area in
 which the child was last enrolled in a special education program within the same academic year, the local educational agency shall provide the pupil with a free appropriate public education, including services comparable to those described in the previously approved individualized education program, in consultation with a parent or guardian, for a period not to exceed 30 days, by which time the local educational agency shall adopt the previously approved individualized education program or shall develop, adopt, and implement a new individualized education program that is consistent with federal and state law, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 56325.

(2) If the child has an individualized education program and transfers into a district from a district operating programs under the same special education local
 plan area of the district in which the child was last enrolled in a special education program within the same academic year, the new district shall continue, without delay, to provide services comparable to those described in the existing approved individualized education program, unless the parent and the local educational agency agree to develop, adopt, and implement a new individualized education program that is consistent with state and federal law, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 56325.

(3) If the child has an individualized education program and transfers from an educational agency located outside the state to a district within the state within the same academic year, the local educational agency shall provide the pupil with a free appropriate public education, including services comparable to those described in
 the previously approved individualized education program, in consultation with a parent or guardian, until the local educational agency conducts an assessment as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 56325.

(4) In order to facilitate the transition for an individual with exceptional needs described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, the new school in which the pupil enrolls shall take reasonable steps to promptly obtain the pupil’s records, as specified, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 56325.

(n) The parent or guardian shall have the right and opportunity to examine all school records of the child and to receive complete copies within five business days after a request is made by the parent or guardian, either orally or in writing, and before any meeting
 regarding an individualized education program of the parent’s or guardian’s child or any hearing or resolution session pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 56500), in accordance with Section 56504 and Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 49060) of Part 27.

(o) Upon receipt of a request from a local educational agency where an individual with exceptional needs has enrolled, a former educational agency shall send the pupil’s special education records, or a copy of those records, to the new local educational agency within five working days, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3024 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(p) The department shall do all of the following:

(1) Have a time limit of 60
 calendar days after a complaint is filed with the state educational agency to investigate the complaint.

(2) Give the complainant the opportunity to submit additional information about the allegations in the complaint.

(3) Review all relevant information and make an independent determination as to whether there is a violation of a requirement of this part or Part B of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.).

(4) Issue a written decision pursuant to Section 300.152(a)(5) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(q) A prehearing mediation conference shall be scheduled within 15 calendar days of receipt by the
 Superintendent of the request for mediation, and shall be completed within 30 calendar days after the request for mediation, unless both parties to the prehearing mediation conference agree to extend the time for completing the mediation, pursuant to Section 56500.3.

(r) Any request for a due process hearing arising from subdivision (a) of Section 56501 shall be filed within two years from the date the party initiating the request knew or had reason to know of facts underlying the basis for the request, except that this timeline shall not apply to a parent if the parent was prevented from requesting the due process hearing, pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 56505.

(s) The Superintendent shall ensure that, within 45 calendar days after receipt of a written due process
 hearing request, the hearing is immediately commenced and completed, including any mediation requested at any point during the hearing process, and a final administrative decision is rendered, pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 56502.

(t) If either party to a due process hearing intends to be represented by an attorney in the due process hearing, notice of that intent shall be given to the other party at least 10 calendar days before the hearing, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 56507.

(u) Any party to a due process hearing shall have the right to be informed by the other parties to the hearing, at least 10 calendar days before the hearing, as to what those parties believe are the issues to be decided at the hearing and their proposed resolution of those
 issues, pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (e) of Section 56505.

(v) Any party to a due process hearing shall have the right to receive from other parties to the hearing, at least five business days before the hearing, a copy of all documents, including all assessments completed and not completed by that date, and a list of all witnesses and their general area of testimony that the parties intend to present at the hearing, pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (e) of Section 56505.

(w) An appeal of a due process hearing decision shall be made within 90 calendar days of receipt of the hearing decision, pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 56505.

(x) A complaint filed with the department shall allege a violation of
 the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) or a provision of this part that occurred not more than one year before the date that the complaint is received by the department, pursuant to Section 56500.2 and Section 300.153(c) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(y) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 901, Sec. 2.   (AB 438)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

56045.

(a) The Superintendent shall send a notice to the governing board of each local educational agency within 30 days of when the Superintendent determines any of the following:

(1) The local educational agency is substantially out of compliance with one or more significant provisions of this part, the implementing regulations, provisions of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), or the implementing regulations.

(2) The local educational agency fails to comply substantially with corrective action orders issued by the department resulting from focused monitoring findings or complaint investigations.

(3) The local educational agency fails to implement the decision of a due process hearing officer for noncompliance with provisions of this part, the implementing regulations, provisions of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), or the implementing regulations, which noncompliance results in the denial of, or impedes the delivery of, a free appropriate public education for an individual with exceptional needs.

(b) The notice shall provide a description of the special education and related services that are required by law and with which the local educational agency is not in compliance.

(c) Upon receipt of the notification sent pursuant to subdivision (a), the governing board shall at a regularly scheduled public hearing address the issue of noncompliance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56046.

(a) An employee of a local educational agency shall not directly or indirectly use or attempt to use the official authority or influence of the employee for the purpose of intimidating, threatening, coercing, or attempting to intimidate, threaten, or coerce, any person, including, but not limited to, a teacher, a provider of designated instruction and services, a paraprofessional, an instructional aide, a behavioral aide, a health aide, other educators or staff of the local educational agency, a private individual or entity under contract with the local educational agency, or a subordinate of the employee, for the purpose of interfering with the action of that person at any time, to assist a parent or guardian of a pupil with exceptional needs to obtain services or accommodations for that pupil.

(b) If a person described in subdivision (a), believes an employee or agent of a local educational agency is in violation of subdivision (a) because of using or attempting to use official authority or influence, that person may file a complaint under the Uniform Complaint Procedures as set forth in Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations. If a person files a complaint pursuant to this subdivision, the state shall intervene directly and the conditions for intervention in Section 4650 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations are not applicable.

(c) This section does not limit or alter any right a person described in subdivision (a) may have to file a complaint pursuant to either a governing board-adopted grievance process or a collectively bargained grievance process.

(d) This section does not do any of the following:

(1) Limit or alter the right or duty of a public school official to direct or discipline an employee or contractor.

(2) Prevent a local educational agency from enforcing a law or regulation regarding conflicts of interest, incompatible activities, or the confidentiality of pupil records.

(e) (1) For purposes of this section, “services or accommodations” includes information that would assist a parent or guardian to obtain a free appropriate public education for his or her child as guaranteed by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), or other services or accommodations guaranteed under Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794) and the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), as well as state laws regarding individuals with exceptional needs.

(2) For purposes of this section, “use of official authority or influence” includes promising to confer or conferring any benefit, affecting or threatening to affect any reprisal, or taking, directing others to take, recommending, processing, or approving any personnel action, including, but not limited to, appointment, promotion, transfer, assignment, performance evaluation, suspension, or other disciplinary action. “Use of official authority or influence” does not include good faith advocacy by an employee of a public school agency, to any person including another agency employee or contractor, regarding the services, if any, to be provided to a pupil under the laws referred to in paragraph (1).

(f) This section does not diminish the rights, privileges, or remedies of a public school employee under any other federal or state law or under an employment contract or collective bargaining agreement.

(g) A school employee’s or contractor’s assistance offered to a parent or guardian of a pupil with exceptional needs to obtain services or accommodations for that pupil shall not interfere with the school employee’s or contractor’s regular duties for the local educational agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56048.

The superintendent shall review the information and calculations submitted by special education local plan areas in support of all apportionment computations described in this part. The review shall be conducted on the data submitted during the initial year of apportionment and for the first succeeding fiscal year only. Adjustments to any year’s apportionment shall be received by the superintendent from the special education local plan area prior to the end of the first fiscal year following the fiscal year to be adjusted. The superintendent shall consider and adjust only the information and computational factors originally established during an eligible fiscal year, if the superintendent’s review determines that they are correct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 89, Sec. 17.   Effective June 30, 1998.   Operative July 1, 1998, by Sec. 62 of Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

56049.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) All pupils are general education pupils first, including pupils with disabilities.

(b) Comprehensive local educational agency and school-level fiscal and programmatic planning, including planning conducted pursuant to Section 52064, must reflect the needs of all pupils, including pupils with disabilities.

(c) Inclusion in general education classrooms and programs should be considered the first setting for all pupils, unless the individualized education program for a pupil with a disability determines that another setting is more suitable to guarantee a free and appropriate public
 education.

(d) Data transparency and analysis are essential to understanding the needs of pupils. Local educational agencies should use all available data sources on pupils with disabilities, with a particular focus on least restrictive environment data, to inform continuous improvement efforts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 919, Sec. 1.   (SB 692)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

56049.1.

(a) On or before November 30, 2023, the department shall publish data related to federal measures of least restrictive environment for pupils with disabilities on its internet website and shall include it as a resource on the California School Dashboard, established pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 52064.5.

(b) The data shall be disaggregated by race or ethnicity and local educational agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 919, Sec. 2.   (SB 692)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Surrogate Parents [56050. - 56050.]

56050.

(a) For the purposes of this article, “surrogate parent” shall be defined as it is defined in Section 300.519 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) A surrogate parent may represent an individual with exceptional needs in matters relating to identification, assessment, instructional planning and development, educational placement, reviewing and revising the individualized education program, and in other matters relating to the provision of a free appropriate public education to the individual. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this representation shall include the provision of written consent to the individualized education program including nonemergency medical services, mental health treatment services, and occupational or physical therapy services pursuant to Chapter 26.5 (commencing with Section 7570) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. The surrogate parent may sign any consent relating to individualized education program purposes.

(c) A surrogate parent shall be held harmless by the State of California when acting in his or her official capacity except for acts or omissions that are found to have been wanton, reckless, or malicious.

(d) A surrogate parent shall also be governed by Section 7579.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.7. Foster Parents [56055. - 56055.]

56055.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), a foster parent may exercise, to the extent permitted by federal law, including, but not limited to, Section 300.30 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the rights related to his or her foster child’s education that a parent has under Title 20 (commencing with Section 1400) of the United States Code and pursuant to Part 300 (commencing with Section 300.1) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The foster parent may represent the foster child for the duration of the foster parent-foster child relationship in matters relating to identification, assessment, instructional planning and development, educational
 placement, reviewing and revising an individualized education program, if
 necessary, and in all other matters relating to the provision of a free appropriate public education of the child. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this representation shall include the provision of written consent to the individualized education program, including nonemergency medical services, mental health treatment services, and occupational or physical therapy services pursuant to this chapter. The foster parent may sign any consent relating to individualized education program purposes.

(2) A foster parent exercising rights relative to a foster child under this section may consult with the parent or guardian of the child to ensure continuity of health, mental health, or other services.

(b) A foster parent who had been excluded by court order from making
 educational decisions on behalf of a pupil does not have the rights relative to the pupil set forth in subdivision (a).

(c) This section only applies if the juvenile court has limited the right of the parent or guardian to make educational decisions on behalf of the child, and the child has been placed in a planned permanent living arrangement pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) of Section 366.21, Section 366.22, Section 366.26, or paragraph (5) or (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 727.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) For purposes of this section, a foster parent includes an approved relative, approved nonrelative extended family member, as defined in Section 362.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, a licensed or certified foster parent, a resource family,
 as defined in Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or a person who has been designated by the court as a specified placement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 1.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.9.  Qualifications for Special Education Teachers [56058. - 56059.]

56058.

Special education teachers providing instruction and educational services under this part shall meet the same “highly qualified” requirements, as defined in Section 1401(10) of Title 20 of the United States Code, and in Section 300.18 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and personnel qualifications described in Section 1412(a)(14) of Title 20 of the United States Code, and in Section 300.156 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 9.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56059.

(a) This part does not create a right of action on behalf of an individual with exceptional needs or class of pupils for failure of a state or local educational agency employee to be highly qualified.

(b) In accordance with Section 300.156(e) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, nothing in this part prevents a parent from filing a complaint with the department under Section 56500.2, and under Sections 300.151 to 300.153, inclusive, of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, about staff qualifications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 10.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Substitute Teachers [56060. - 56063.]

56060.

A noncredentialed person shall not substitute for any special education certificated position.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56061.

A person holding a valid credential authorizing substitute teaching may serve as a substitute for the appropriately credentialed special education teacher as follows:

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the employer shall not employ an inappropriately credentialed substitute teacher for a period of more than 20 cumulative school days for each special education teacher absent during each school year.

(b) Upon application by the district or county office, the superintendent may approve an extension of 20 school days in addition to those authorized by subdivision (a).

(c) Only in extraordinary circumstances may an additional number of days be granted beyond the 40 school days provided for by subdivisions (a) and (b). Such additional days shall be granted in writing by the superintendent. The superintendent shall report to the board on all requests granted for an additional number of days pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56062.

The employer shall use the following priorities in placing substitute teachers in special education classrooms:

(a) A substitute teacher with the appropriate special education credential or credentials.

(b) A substitute teacher with any other special education credential or credentials.

(c) A substitute teacher with a regular teaching credential.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56063.

The employer shall be responsible for seeking, and maintaining lists of, appropriately credentialed substitute teachers. The employer shall contact institutions of higher education with approved special education programs for possible recommendations of appropriately credentialed special education personnel.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Qualifications for Designated Instruction and Services Personnel, Related Services Personnel, and Paraprofessionals [56070. - 56070.]

56070.

(a) In accordance with Section 1412(a)(14)(A), (B), and (D) of Title 20 of the United States Code and Section 300.156(a), (b), and (d) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, qualifications for designated instruction and services personnel, related services personnel, and paraprofessionals shall include the following:

(1) Be consistent with a state-approved or state-recognized certification, licensing, registration, or other comparable requirements that apply to the professional discipline in which those personnel are providing special education or designated instruction and services, and related services.

(2) Ensure that personnel who deliver services in their discipline or profession meet the requirements of this subdivision and have not had certification or licensure requirements waived on an emergency, temporary, or provisional basis.

(3) Allow paraprofessionals and assistants who are appropriately trained and supervised, in accordance with state law, regulation, or written policy, in meeting the requirements of this part to be used to assist in the provision of special education, designated instruction and services, and related services under this part to individuals with exceptional needs.

(b) Local educational agencies shall take measurable steps to recruit, hire, train, and retain highly qualified personnel to provide special education, designated instruction and services, and related services under this part to individuals with exceptional needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 11.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Administration [56100. - 56194.]



  ARTICLE 1. State Board of Education [56100. - 56101.]

56100.

The board shall do all of the following:

(a) Adopt rules and regulations necessary for the efficient administration of this part.

(b) Adopt criteria and procedures for the review and approval by the board of local plans.

(c) Adopt size and scope standards for determining the efficacy of local plans submitted by special education local plan areas, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 56195.1.

(d) Provide review, upon petition, to a local educational agency that appeals a decision made by the department that affects its providing services under this part except a decision made pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 56500).

(e) Review and approve a program evaluation plan for special education programs provided by this part in accordance with Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 56600). This plan may be approved for up to three years.

(f) Recommend to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing the adoption of standards for the certification of professional personnel for special education programs conducted pursuant to this part.

(g) Adopt regulations to provide specific procedural criteria and guidelines for the identification of pupils as individuals with exceptional needs.

(h) Adopt guidelines of reasonable pupil progress and achievement for individuals with exceptional needs. The guidelines shall be developed to aid teachers and parents or guardians in assessing a pupil’s individualized education program and the appropriateness of the special education services.

(i) In accordance with the requirements of federal law, adopt regulations for all individualized education programs for individuals with exceptional needs, including programs administered by other state or local agencies.

(j) Adopt uniform rules and regulations relating to parental due process rights in the area of special education.

(k) Adopt rules and regulations regarding the ownership and transfer of materials and equipment, including facilities, related to transfer of programs, reorganization, or restructuring of special education local plan areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56101.

(a) A public agency, as defined in Section 56028.5, may request the board to grant a waiver of any provision of this code or regulations adopted pursuant to that provision if the waiver is necessary or beneficial to the content and implementation of the pupil’s individualized education program and does not abrogate any right provided individuals with exceptional needs and their parents or guardians under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), or affect the compliance of a local educational agency with the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), and federal regulations relating thereto.

(b) The board may grant, in whole or in part, any request pursuant to subdivision (a) when the facts indicate that failure to do so would hinder implementation of the pupil’s individualized education program or compliance by a local educational agency with federal mandates for a free appropriate public education for children or youth with disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Superintendent of Public Instruction [56120. - 56138.]

56120.

The superintendent shall administer the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56121.

The superintendent shall grant approval of the organization of the local plans within each county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56122.

(a) The Superintendent shall establish guidelines for the development of local plans, including a standard format for local plans, and provide assistance in the development of local plans. The purposes of the guidelines and assistance shall be to help districts and county offices benefit from the experience of other local agencies that implement programs under this part, including, but not limited to, reducing paperwork, increasing parental involvement, improving transparency, and providing effective staff development activities. To the extent possible, all forms, reports, and evaluations shall be designed to satisfy simultaneously state and federal requirements.

(b) On or before July 1, 2019, the department shall develop templates that shall be used by special
 education local plan areas, districts, and county superintendents of schools to meet the requirements of Sections 56195.1 and 56205.

(c) Commencing July 1, 2027, each local plan shall include an annual assurances support plan. The purpose of the annual assurances support plan is to demonstrate how the special education local plan area and its participating agencies are coordinating for purposes of assuring effective outcomes for pupils with disabilities. The department shall develop a template for the annual assurances support plan by July 1, 2026. The annual assurances support plan shall include all of the following elements:

(1) A description of how the governing board of the special education local plan area has determined that the special education local plan area will support participating agencies in achieving the goals, actions, and services identified in their local control and accountability plans.

(2) A description of how the governing board of the special education local plan area has determined that the special education local plan area will connect its participating agencies in need of technical assistance to the statewide system of support.

(3) A brief description of the
 services, technical assistance, and support the governing board of the special education local plan area has determined that it will provide in meeting the requirements under paragraphs (1) to (21), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 56205.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 89.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

56123.

The superintendent shall review and recommend to the board for approval, local plans developed and submitted in accordance with this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56124.

The superintendent shall promote innovation and improvement in the field of special education at the public and nonpublic, nonsectarian school, district, county, and state levels.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56125.

(a) The Superintendent shall monitor, provide technical assistance, and enforce the provisions of this part pursuant to Section 56600.6.

(b) The Superintendent shall monitor the implementation of local plans by periodically conducting onsite program and fiscal reviews, in accordance with Sections 300.114 to 300.120, inclusive, of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56126.

The superintendent shall encourage the maximum practicable involvement of parents of children enrolled in special education programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56127.

The superintendent shall make recommendations in the areas of staff development, curriculum, testing and multicultural assessment, and the development of materials for special education programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56128.

The superintendent shall prepare for board approval, as necessary, any state plan required by federal law in order that this state may qualify for any federal funds available for the education of individuals with exceptional needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56129.

The Superintendent shall maintain the state special schools and diagnostic centers in accordance with Part 32 (commencing with Section 59000) so that the services of those schools and centers are coordinated with the services of the local educational agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56130.

The superintendent shall develop in accordance with Section 56602, a biennial performance report of special education programs authorized under this part for submission to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 49.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

56131.

The superintendent shall apportion funds in accordance with Chapter 7.2 (commencing with Section 56836) and approved local plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 89, Sec. 18.   Effective June 30, 1998.   Operative July 1, 1998, by Sec. 62 of Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

56132.

The superintendent shall assist districts, county offices, and special education local plan areas in the improvement and evaluation of their programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 89, Sec. 19.   Effective June 30, 1998.   Operative July 1, 1998, by Sec. 62 of Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

56133.

The superintendent shall provide for the mediation conference prescribed by Sections 56502 and 56503 and the state hearing prescribed by Section 56505.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1353, Sec. 38.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56134.

The superintendent shall perform the duties prescribed by Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 56452).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1296, Sec. 13.7.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

56135.

(a) The superintendent shall be responsible for assuring provision of, and supervising, education and related services to individuals with exceptional needs as specifically required pursuant to the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.).

(b) Nothing in this part shall be construed to authorize the superintendent to prescribe health care services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1296, Sec. 14.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

56136.

The superintendent shall develop guidelines for each low incidence disability area and provide technical assistance to parents, teachers, and administrators regarding the implementation of the guidelines. The guidelines shall clarify the identification, assessment, planning of, and the provision of, specialized services to pupils with low incidence disabilities. The superintendent shall consider the guidelines when monitoring programs serving pupils with low incidence disabilities pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 56836.04. The adopted guidelines shall be promulgated for the purpose of establishing recommended guidelines and shall not operate to impose minimum state requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 89, Sec. 20.   Effective June 30, 1998.   Operative July 1, 1998, by Sec. 62 of Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

56138.

The Superintendent shall develop, and the board shall adopt, performance goals and indicators for individuals with exceptional needs that are consistent with, to the maximum extent appropriate, the standards for all pupils in the public education system, in accordance with the provisions of Section 1412(a)(15) of Title 20 of the United States Code and Section 300.157 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. County Offices [56140. - 56140.]

56140.

County offices shall do all of the following:

(a) Initiate and submit to the Superintendent a countywide plan for special education that demonstrates the coordination of all local plans submitted pursuant to Section 56205 and
 that ensures that all individuals with exceptional needs residing within the county, including those enrolled in alternative education programs, including, but not limited to, alternative schools, charter schools, opportunity schools and classes, community day schools operated by districts, community schools operated by county offices of education, and juvenile court schools, will have access to appropriate special education programs and related services. However, a county office shall not be required to submit a countywide plan when all the districts within the county elect to submit a single local plan.

(b) Within 45 days, approve or disapprove any proposed local plan submitted by a district or group of districts within the county or counties.